Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1664.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Historic and Older Building Redevelopment Assistance Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A property owner or developer that submits an application under section 3(d)."Application." An application submitted under section 3(d)."Department." The Department of Community and Economic <--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 Development of the Commonwealth."Developer." A person that promotes or constructs redevelopment projects and is engaged in the development of real estate."Fund." The Historic and Older Building Redevelopment Fund established under section 4(a)."Grant." A grant awarded under this act."Historic and older OLDER building." A building located in this Commonwealth that is at least 50 years old."Historic character." All of the visual aspects and physical features that comprise the appearance of a historic and older building such as the overall shape of the building, its materials, craftsmanship, decorative details, interior spaces and features, as well as the various aspects of its site and environment."Program." The Historic and Older Building Redevelopment Assistance Grant Program established under section 3(a)."Project." The redevelopment, rehabilitation or enhancement of a historic and AN older building for which a developer or a property owner seeks a grant under this act."Property owner." An owner of record evidenced by a publicly recorded deed and an equitable owner that can demonstrate an ownership interest in a property as provided by law, including:(1) an inherited interest in a property;(2) a party to an agreement of sale or long-term leasehold agreement;(3) an equitable owner of record prior to a fraudulent conveyance of the property; and(4) a trust beneficiary or a person holding a partial ownership interest in the property such as tenancy by the 20250HB1664PN2626 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entirety, joint tenancy, tenancy in common and life estate."Redevelopment plan." A plan that provides for the improvement of a historic and AN older building and meets the requirements under section 3(e).Section 3. Historic and Older Building Redevelopment Assistance Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Historic and Older Building Redevelopment Assistance Grant Program is established within the department.(b) Administration.--The program shall be administered by the department.(c) Purpose.--The purpose of the program shall be to issue grants for the redevelopment, rehabilitation or enhancement of historic and older buildings across this Commonwealth.(d) Application.--An applicant must submit a written grant application to the department in a manner prescribed by the department. The application must include the following information:(1) A detailed description of the project and how the grant would be used, including any private or public sector participation.(2) A copy of the redevelopment plan required under subsection (e).(3) A statement of the ability to produce income once the project is complete and an explanation of how the project will contribute significantly to economic and community redevelopment or the revitalization of adjacent communities.(4) If applicable, an explanation of how the project will provide for historic preservation or commercial or recreational opportunities for the public.20250HB1664PN2626 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) If the project includes the purchase of property, an identification of the intended use of the property and a timeline for redevelopment of the property.(6) The total cost of the project.(7) A detailed description of the practices the applicant will perform to improve or maintain the property and the historic character of the property.(8) A statement of favorable consideration or endorsement of the project from a local nonprofit economic or community development organization.(9) Evidence of a firm commitment from the developer or property owner to use the project upon completion.(10) If applicable, how the redevelopment will increase accessibility for people with disabilities.(11) Other information that the department may require.(e) Redevelopment plan.--An applicant that applies for a grant shall prepare a redevelopment plan. The redevelopment plan, at a minimum, shall:(1) Establish the project use as commercial, industrial, transportation or multifamily residential.(2) Involve at least one of the following primary activities:(i) Mechanical improvements.(ii) Electrical improvements.(iii) Plumbing system improvements.(iv) Fire protection system improvements.(v) Building egress or accessibility improvements.(vi) Structural improvements.(3) Clearly designate the property and areas included within the redevelopment plan for the property.20250HB1664PN2626 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Identify the economic impact on the improved area, the surrounding neighborhood and the municipality in which the property is located.(5) Identify any Federal or State law applicable to historic OLDER building preservation or restoration and discuss plans for compliance.(6) Provide any additional information as required by the department for redevelopment plans.(f) Publication and notice.--The department shall transmit notice of the program's availability to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin after the effective date of this subsection.(g) Department action.--(1) The department shall review an application and, within 90 days of receipt of an application, approve or disapprove the application.(2) In reviewing grant applications, the department shall consider the following:(i) Whether the project proposed to be funded is authorized under this act.(ii) Whether the application complies with this act.(iii) Consistency of the project with the redevelopment plan required under subsection (e) for the area in which the property is located.(iv) Additional historic OLDER BUILDING preservation, commercial or recreational opportunities for the public provided by the project.(v) Significant contribution by the project to the municipality's economic and community redevelopment or 20250HB1664PN2626 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the revitalization of adjacent communities.(vi) The viability of the redevelopment plan required under subsection (e).(vii) The level of public and private commitment and other resources available for the project.(viii) Other criteria that the department considers relevant.(h) Award of grants.--(1) The department may issue a grant award to an approved applicant for a project that contributes to the redevelopment or revitalization of historic and older buildings throughout this Commonwealth that meet any of the following purposes:(i) Provide for activities on the property consistent with the project's redevelopment plan.(ii) Provide for the demolition of buildings, structures or other facilities on the property that are not historic and older buildings or do not contribute to the property's historic character and are inconsistent with the project's redevelopment plan.(iii) Provide for the acquisition of property or the assembly of property consistent with the project's redevelopment plan.(iv) Provide public infrastructure and public facility improvements to the property consistent with the project's redevelopment plan.(v) Provide for the improvement or maintenance of the historical nature and traditional style of properties OLDER BUILDINGS within the municipality consistent with the project's redevelopment plan.20250HB1664PN2626 - 6 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The department shall award a grant of no less than $50,000 and no more than $500,000 or an amount equal to 30% of the total project cost, whichever is less, to each eligible applicant, subject to the availability of funding.(3) A project must be completed no later than two years after the date of the grant. The department may grant an extension for an additional period up to six months.Section 4. Historic and Older Building Redevelopment Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Historic and Older Building Redevelopment Fund is established in the State Treasury. Money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of awarding grants in accordance with this act.(b) Alternative funding.--The department may accept alternative funding, including Federal funds, grants and donations from any source to assist with the goals of this act. All money received by the department under this subsection shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Administrative expenses.--The department may use no more than 3% of money in the fund for administrative costs associated with the program.(d) Transfer to General Fund.--Any money in the fund that is unexpended, unencumbered or uncommitted two years after the effective date of this section shall be transferred to the General Fund.Section 5. Recapture.The department may recapture all or a portion of a grant award, as determined by the department, if the project is not timely completed as provided in section 3(h)(3).Section 6. Reports.20250HB1664PN2626 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall submit a report to the General Assembly on expenditures from the fund and the progress of economic development and rehabilitation of historic and older buildings throughout this Commonwealth following the expiration of the grant making authority under this act. The report shall include the following information:(1) The number of projects.(2) The types of projects.(3) The number and amount of grants.(4) The economic impact of the program.(5) Recommendations for the continuation or expansion of the program.(6) Any other information required by the department.Section 7. Guidelines.The department shall develop guidelines necessary to implement this act.Section 8. Expiration of grant authority.The department may not award grants beginning two years after the effective date of this section.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1664PN2626 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021